Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Licensing Operation of Affiliated Agencies

§ 2681.
License required; ambulance license requirement.

A person furnishing ambulance services or first responder services shall obtain a license to furnish services under this subchapter.

In order to obtain and maintain a license, an ambulance service shall be required to provide its services in a manner that does not discriminate on the basis of income, funding source, or severity of health needs, in order to ensure access to ambulance services within the licensee’s service area.
(b) (1) In order to obtain and maintain a license, an ambulance service shall be required to provide its services in a manner that does not discriminate on the basis of income, funding source, or severity of health needs, in order to ensure access to ambulance services within the licensee’s service area.

The Department of Health shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 112

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1969; amended

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2682.
Powers of the Department of Health.

The Department of Health shall administer this subchapter and shall have power to:

Issue licenses for ambulance services and first responder services under this subchapter.

Revoke or suspend upon due notice and opportunity for hearing the license of any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this subchapter, or any rule or requirement adopted under its authority.

Make, adopt, amend, and revise, as it deems necessary or expedient, reasonable rules in order to promote and protect the health, safety, and welfare of members of the public using, served by, or in need of emergency medical treatment. Any rule may be repealed within 90 days of the date of its adoption by a majority vote of all the district boards. Such rules may cover or relate to:

age, training, and physical requirements for emergency medical services personnel;

design and equipping of ambulances;

cooperation with hospitals and organizations in other related fields, and participation in central communications procedures; and

any other matters properly within the purposes of this chapter.

No fee or other payment shall be required of an applicant for a license.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 112

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1969; amended

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2019, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 14, 2020;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2683.
Term of license.

Full licenses shall be issued on forms to be prescribed by the Department of Health for a period of three years beginning on January 1 or for the balance of any such three-year period. Temporary, conditional, or provisional licenses may also be issued by the Department.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 112

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1969; amended

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2019, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 14, 2020;

2019, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 2684.
Penalty.

A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 112

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1969; amended

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 2685.
Liability for cost of services.

A person who receives emergency medical treatment from an ambulance or first responder service or transportation by an ambulance service shall be liable in contract to the person providing such services for the reasonable and necessary cost of the services, whether or not he or she has agreed or consented to such liability.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 112

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1969; amended

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 2686.
False requests for ambulance service or first responder service.

A person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if he or she requests ambulance or first responder service from a person or organization engaged in providing such service without actual need for such service, knowing that the request is false or baseless.
A person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $200.00 or imprisoned not more than 30 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 1970; amended

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 2687.
Civil liability limited.

Volunteer personnel, whether or not they receive or expect to receive nominal payments and reimbursement for expenses, who render emergency medical treatment shall:

be afforded the protection of

12 V.S.A. § 519

;

not be considered practitioners of the healing arts for purposes of

12 V.S.A. § 519(b)

; and

not be liable for civil damages for rendering emergency medical treatment unless their actions constitute gross negligence or willful misconduct.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 2688.
Armed forces.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the U.S. Armed Forces or the Vermont National Guard or their respective personnel while serving in such capacity.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 2689.
Reimbursement for ambulance service providers.

When an ambulance service provides emergency medical treatment to a person who is insured by a health insurance policy, plan, or contract that provides benefits for emergency medical treatment, the health insurer shall reimburse the ambulance service directly, subject to the terms and conditions of the health insurance policy, plan, or contract.
(a) (1) When an ambulance service provides emergency medical treatment to a person who is insured by a health insurance policy, plan, or contract that provides benefits for emergency medical treatment, the health insurer shall reimburse the ambulance service directly, subject to the terms and conditions of the health insurance policy, plan, or contract.

The Department of Financial Regulation shall enforce the provisions of this subsection.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with coordination of benefits or to require a health insurer to provide coverage for services not otherwise covered under the insured’s policy, plan, or contract.

Nothing in this section shall preclude an insurer from negotiating with and subsequently entering into a contract with a nonparticipating ambulance service to establish rates of reimbursement for emergency medical treatment.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2019, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 14, 2020.